Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4004.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 25. (1) The bureau shall give a prizewinner in the Michigan lotto game the option of receiving his or her the prize in a single payment or in installments. This option shall must be made available to and exercised by the purchaser of a Michigan lotto game ticket at the point of purchase. As used in this subsection, "Michigan lotto game" means a game administered by the bureau in which the matrix is 6 out of 49 numbers drawn. (2) The right of any person to a prize drawn from the state lottery is not assignable, except as provided in this section. The commissioner shall be is discharged of from all further liability upon on payment of a prize pursuant to under this section. (3) Payment of any a prize drawn may be made to a person pursuant to an appropriate judicial under a properly issued court order. (4) Payment of any a prize drawn may be made to the this state pursuant to under section 32. (5) If a prizewinner dies before collecting the full amount of his or her the prize drawn from the state lottery, the bureau shall continue to make the remaining prize payments to the prizewinner's surviving spouse and the prizewinner's each living children child of the prizewinner, in equal proportions, unless otherwise directed by the prizewinner. If there is not a no surviving spouse, or living children child, or other designated beneficiaries, beneficiary of the prizewinner, the bureau shall pay the remaining prize payments shall be made to the prizewinner's estate. (6) Except as provided in subsection (11), (12), payment of any prize drawn may be made to any a person pursuant to under a voluntary assignment of the right to receive future prize payments, in whole or in part, if the assignment is made to a person or entity designated pursuant to an appropriate judicial under a properly issued order of a court of competent jurisdiction located in either the county in which the assignor resides or the county in which the bureau is located. An order approving the assignment and directing the commissioner to pay the assignee all or a part of future prize payments is properly issued if the court finds that all of the following circumstances exist: (a) The assignment is in writing, executed by the assignor in accordance with the laws of this state, and the terms of the assignment are disclosed, including the identity of the assignee, the portion or portions of prize payments to be assigned, and the amounts and dates of any payments that shall will be given in exchange for the assignment. (b) The assignor provides has provided a sworn affidavit to the court attesting that the assignor is of sound mind, is not acting under duress, has been advised regarding the assignment by his or her the assignor's legal counsel, and understands and agrees that the this state and the commissioner will have no further liability or responsibility to make prize payments to the assignor. (c) The proposed assignment does not include or cover payments or portions of payments that are subject to section 32. (d) Not A copy of the complaint or motion for the approval of the voluntary assignment under this subsection and a notice of hearing on the complaint or motion has been served on the attorney general not less than 5 days after filing a petition for a judicial order that approves a voluntary assignment under this subsection the complaint or motion was filed and not less than 10 days before a the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause a copy of the petition and notice of hearing on the petition to be served upon the attorney general. The and the attorney general or his or her assistant shall be permitted had the opportunity to appear and take action that is in the best interests of the bureau and this state. (7) Soliciting or offering rights to lottery prize payments, either by assignment or through pledge as collateral for a loan, shall must not be considered selling or offering for sale lottery tickets or shares under this act. (8) The commissioner is authorized to may establish a reasonable fee to defray the cost of any administrative expenses associated with assignments made pursuant to under this section, including the cost of a any processing fee that may be imposed by a private annuity provider. The amount of the fee shall established under this subsection must reflect the direct and indirect costs associated with processing the assignments. (9) Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the commissioner or an officer or employee of the bureau shall not disclose the name, address, or any other personal information concerning a winner of a prize greater than $10,000.00 drawn from the state lottery, unless the winner of a the prize agrees in writing to allow the disclosure. Subject to subsection (10), the information protected against disclosure under this section is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (10) Notwithstanding subsection (9), Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the commissioner or an officer or employee of the bureau may shall not disclose the name, address, or any other personal information concerning a winner of a prize awarded under a game played pursuant to a joint enterprise, to the extent required under the joint enterprise participation agreement executed by the commissioner.unless the winner of the prize agrees in writing to allow the disclosure. (11) Information protected against disclosure under subsections (9) and (10) is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (12) (11) If at any time the federal internal revenue service Internal Revenue Service or a court of competent jurisdiction issues a determination letter, revenue ruling, other public ruling of the internal revenue service, Internal Revenue Service, or published decision to any state lottery or state lottery prizewinner declaring that the voluntary assignment of prizes will affect the federal income tax treatment of prizewinners who do not assign their prizes, the commissioner shall immediately file a copy of that letter, ruling, or published decision with the secretary of state and the office of the state court administrator. A court shall not issue a voluntary assignment order under subsection (6) after the date the ruling, letter, or published decision is filed.